Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6573YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2238 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ 1 ACQUIRING CERTAIN PUBLIC UTILITIES ââ STUDY. 2 1. The general assembly finds that certain public utilities 3 subject to rate regulation are derelict in their obligation to 4 their customers with conduct that is unsuitable for an entity 5 enjoying the immense privilege of a government-sanctioned 6 monopoly. 7 2. The department of administrative services shall work 8 with an investment firm, selected at the discretion of the 9 department, to conduct a study determining the cost and 10 feasibility of the state of Iowa acquiring a public utility 11 subject to rate regulation under chapter 476, or the public 12 utilityâs assets within the state, that provides electric 13 and natural gas service to more than two hundred thousand 14 customers in the state and is headquartered outside of Iowa. 15 The department shall determine the cost and feasibility of 16 reorganizing or reallocating the assets of any such public 17 utility in a way that maximizes the benefit to electric and 18 natural gas customers within the public utilityâs current 19 service territory. The department shall submit a report 20 detailing its findings and recommendations to the general 21 assembly on or before December 15, 2026. 22